Louisiana, session 2026, SB92.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:624.1(D) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§624.1. Submission of sexual assault collection kits
* * *
D. The office of state police may use a phased implementation process in
order to launch the system and facilitate entry and use of the system for required
participants. The office of state police may phase initial participation according to
the region or volume. All entities, including law enforcement, district attorney
offices, and healthcare providers having custody of sexual assault collection kits,
shall provide all required information to the tracking system and fully participate in
the system no later than July 1, 2024. The office of state police shall submit a report
on the current status and plan for launching the system, including the plan for phased
implementation, to the Louisiana Sexual Assault Oversight Commission, the Senate
Committee on Judiciary B, the House Committee on Administration of Criminal
Justice, and the governor no later than January 1, 2024.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.